da: Komponenter inkluderet: CPU-køler; Kabler; Kasse; Grafikkort (GPU); Køleblok; Bundkort; Operativsystemsmedie; Strømforsyningsenhed (PSU); Processor (CPU); RAM; Skruer og monteringshardware; Lagerdrev; Termisk pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth-kort; Andet
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos: Cooler de CPU; Cabos; Caixa; Placa de vídeo (GPU); Dissipador de calor; Placa-mãe; Mídia do sistema operacional; Fonte de alimentação (PSU); Processador (CPU); RAM; Parafusos e ferragens de montagem; Unidade de armazenamento; Pasta térmica; Placa Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Outro
vi: Linh kiện đi kèm: Tản nhiệt CPU; Dây cáp; Hộp đựng; Card đồ họa (GPU); Tản nhiệt; Bo mạch chủ; Phương tiện hệ điều hành; Bộ nguồn (PSU); Bộ xử lý (CPU); RAM; Ốc vít và phần cứng lắp đặt; Ổ lưu trữ; Keo tản nhiệt; Card Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Khác
cs: Součásti v balení: Chladič CPU; Kabely; Pouzdro; Grafická karta (GPU); Chladič; Základní deska; Instalační média operačního systému; Napájecí zdroj (PSU); Procesor (CPU); RAM; Šrouby a montážní materiál; Úložný disk; Teplovodivá pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth karta; Jiné
el: Συμπεριλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα: Ψύκτρα επεξεργαστή; Καλώδια; Θήκη; Κάρτα γραφικών (GPU); Ψύκτρα; Μητρική πλακέτα; Μέσα λειτουργικού συστήματος; Μονάδα τροφοδοσίας (PSU); Επεξεργαστής (CPU); RAM; Βίδες και εξαρτήματα στήριξης; Μονάδα αποθήκευσης; Θερμική πάστα; Κάρτα Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Άλλο
ja: 含まれるコンポーネント: CPUクーラー; ケーブル; ケース; グラフィックスカード (GPU); ヒートシンク; マザーボード; OSメディア; 電源ユニット (PSU); プロセッサー (CPU); RAM; ネジ及び取り付け金具; ストレージドライブ; サーマルペースト; Wi-Fi/Bluetoothカード; その他
pl: Dołączone komponenty: Chłodzenie procesora; Kable; Obudowa; Karta graficzna (GPU); Radiator; Płyta główna; Nośnik systemu operacyjnego; Zasilacz (PSU); Procesor (CPU); RAM; Śruby i elementy montażowe; Dysk pamięci; Pasta termoprzewodząca; Karta Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Inne
hu: Mellékelt komponensek: CPU hűtő; Kábelek; Tok; Videokártya (GPU); Hűtőborda; Alaplap; Operációs rendszer adathordozó; Tápegység (PSU); Processzor (CPU); RAM; Csavarok és rögzítő elemek; Tárolómeghajtó; Hővezető paszta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth kártya; Egyéb
ko: 포함된 구성요소: CPU 쿨러; 케이블; 케이스; 그래픽 카드 (GPU); 히트싱크; 마더보드; 운영 체제 미디어; 전원 공급 장치 (PSU); 프로세서 (CPU); RAM; 나사 및 장착 하드웨어; 스토리지 드라이브; 써멀 페이스트; Wi-Fi/블루투스 카드; 기타
bg-BG: Включени компоненти: Охладител за процесор; Кабели; Калъф; Графична карта (GPU); Радиатор; Дънна платка; Носител с операционна система; Захранващ блок (PSU); Процесор (CPU); RAM памет; Винтове и монтажен хардуер; Устройство за съхранение; Термопаста; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth карта; Други
hr-HR: Uključene komponente: Hladnjak procesora; Kabeli; Kutija; Grafička kartica (GPU); Hladnjak; Matična ploča; Medij operacijskog sustava; Jedinica za napajanje (PSU); Procesor (CPU); RAM; Vijci i montažni pribor; Pogon za pohranu; Termalna pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth kartica; Ostalo
nb: Komponenter inkludert: CPU-kjøler; Kabler; Hylse; Grafikkort (GPU); Kjøleribbe; Hovedkort; Operativsystemmedia; Strømforsyning (PSU); Prosessor (CPU); RAM; Skruer og monteringsutstyr; Lagringsenhet; Termisk pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth-kort; Annet
sl-SI: Vključene komponente: Hladilnik procesorja; Kabli; Ohišje; Grafična kartica (GPU); Hladilnik; Matična plošča; Medij operacijskega sistema; Napajalnik (PSU); Procesor (CPU); RAM; Vijaki in montažna oprema; Pomnilniški pogon; Termalna pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth kartica; Drugo
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos: Cooler de CPU; Cabos; Revestimento; Placa gráfica (GPU); Dissipador; Placa-mãe; Suporte do sistema operativo; Fonte de alimentação (PSU); Processador (CPU); RAM; Parafusos e ferragens de montagem; Unidade de armazenamento; Pasta térmica; Placa Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Outro
zh-CN: 包含的组件: CPU 散热器; 线缆; 盒; 显卡 (GPU); 散热片; 主板; 操作系统介质; 电源 (PSU); 处理器 (CPU); RAM; 螺丝和安装配件; 存储驱动器; 导热硅脂; Wi-Fi/蓝牙卡; 其他
fr: Composants inclus: Refroidisseur de processeur; Câbles pour appareils électroniques; Boîtier; Carte graphique (GPU); Dissipateur thermique; Carte mère; Support du système d'exploitation; Bloc d'alimentation (PSU); Processeur (CPU); RAM; Vis et matériel de montage; Lecteur de stockage; Pâte thermique; Carte Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Autre
nl: Meegeleverde componenten: CPU-koeler; Kabels; Doos; Grafische kaart (GPU); Koellichaam; Moederbord; Besturingssysteem media; Voedingseenheid (PSU); Processor (CPU); RAM; Schroeven en montagemateriaal; Opslagschijf; Thermische pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth-kaart; Andere
de: Enthaltene Komponenten: CPU-Kühler; Kabel; Kiste; Grafikkarte (GPU); Kühlkörper; Hauptplatine; Betriebssystem-Medien; Netzteil (PSU); Prozessor (CPU); RAM; Schrauben und Montagematerial; Speicherlaufwerk; Wärmeleitpaste; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth-Karte; Sonstiges
es: Componentes incluidos: Enfriador de CPU; Cables; Estuche; Tarjeta gráfica (GPU); Disipador; Placa base; Medio del sistema operativo; Fuente de alimentación (PSU); Procesador (CPU); Memoria RAM; Tornillos y herrajes de montaje; Unidad de almacenamiento; Pasta térmica; Tarjeta Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Otros
tr: Dahil edilen bileşenler: İşlemci soğutucu; Kablolar; Kılıf; Ekran kartı (GPU); Isı emici; Anakart; İşletim sistemi medyası; Güç kaynağı ünitesi (PSU); İşlemci (CPU); RAM; Vidalar ve montaj donanımı; Depolama sürücüsü; Termal macun; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth kartı; Diğer
ro-RO: Componente incluse: Cooler CPU; Cabluri; Casetă; Placă grafică (GPU); Radiator; Placă de bază; Mediu sistem de operare; Sursă de alimentare (PSU); Procesor (CPU); RAM; Șuruburi și hardware de montare; Unitate de stocare; Pastă termică; Placă Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Altele
it: Componenti inclusi: Dissipatore CPU; Cavi; Involucro; Scheda grafica (GPU); Dissipatore di calore; Scheda madre; Supporto sistema operativo; Alimentatore (PSU); Processore (CPU); RAM; Viti e hardware di montaggio; Unità di archiviazione; Pasta termica; Scheda Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Altro
sv: Komponenter som ingår: CPU-kylare; Kablar; Låda; Grafikkort (GPU); Kylfläns; Moderkort; Operativsystemsmedia; Nätaggregat (PSU); Processor (CPU); RAM-minne; Skruvar och monteringshårdvara; Lagringsenhet; Värmepasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth-kort; Övrigt
th: ส่วนประกอบที่รวมอยู่: ตัวระบายความร้อน CPU; สายสัญญาณ; ฝาครอบ; การ์ดจอ (GPU); ฮีตซิงก์; มาเธอร์บอร์ด; สื่อระบบปฏิบัติการ; พาวเวอร์ซัพพลาย (PSU); โปรเซสเซอร์ (CPU); RAM; สกรูและอุปกรณ์ยึด; ไดร์ฟเก็บข้อมูล; ซิลิโคนระบายความร้อน; การ์ด Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; อื่นๆ
ru: Компоненты в комплекте: Кулер процессора; Тросы; Чехол; Видеокарта (GPU); Радиатор; Материнская плата; Носитель операционной системы; Блок питания (БП); Процессор (CPU); ОЗУ; Винты и крепёжное оборудование; Накопитель; Термопаста; Карта Wi-Fi/Bluetooth; Другой
sk-SK: Zahrnuté súčiastky: Chladič CPU; Káble; Puzdro; Grafická karta (GPU); Chladič; Základná doska; Médiá operačného systému; Napájací zdroj (PSU); Procesor (CPU); RAM; Skrutky a montážny materiál; Úložný disk; Tepelná pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth karta; Iné
lt-LT: Pridėti komponentai: Procesoriaus aušintuvas; Kabeliai; Dėklas; Vaizdo plokštė (GPU); Radiatorius; Pagrindinė plokštė; Operacinės sistemos laikmena; Maitinimo blokas (PSU); Procesorius (CPU); RAM; Varžtai ir montavimo detalės; Duomenų saugojimo įrenginys; Šiluminė pasta; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth kortelė; Kita
zh-TW: 包含的元件: CPU 散熱器; 線材; 外殼; 顯示卡 (GPU); 散熱片; 主機板; 作業系統安裝媒體; 電源供應器 (PSU); 處理器 (CPU); 隨機存取記憶體; 螺絲和安裝配件; 儲存裝置; 散熱膏; Wi-Fi/藍牙卡; 其他
fi: Sisältyvät komponentit: Prosessorin jäähdytin; Kaapelit; Kotelo; Näytönohjain (GPU); Jäähdytyselementti; Emolevy; Käyttöjärjestelmämedia; Virtalähde (PSU); Prosessori (CPU); Keskusmuisti; Ruuvit ja kiinnitystarvikkeet; Tallennusasema; Lämpötahna; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth-kortti; Muu
en: Components included: CPU cooler; Cables; Case; Graphics card (GPU); Heatsink; Motherboard; Operating system media; Power supply unit (PSU); Processor (CPU); RAM; Screws and mounting hardware; Storage drive; Thermal paste; Wi-Fi/Bluetooth card; Other